test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-druuqoshw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - drūʼošõ: # adjectives 121 'eng /est julge/fin' - full paradigm
     drūʼošõ+A+Sg+Nom: drūʼošõ
     drūʼošõ+A+Sg+Gen: drūʼošõ
     drūʼošõ+A+Sg+Par: drūʼošõ
     drūʼošõ+A+Sg+Dat: drūʼošõn
     drūʼošõ+A+Sg+Ins: drūʼošõks
     drūʼošõ+A+Sg+Ill: [drūʼošõz, drūʼošõ]
     drūʼošõ+A+Sg+Ela: drūʼošõst
     drūʼošõ+A+Pl+Nom: drūʼošõd
     drūʼošõ+A+Pl+Gen: drūʼošõd
     drūʼošõ+A+Pl+Par: drūʼošidi
     drūʼošõ+A+Pl+Dat: drūʼošõdõn
     drūʼošõ+A+Pl+Ins: drūʼošõdõks
     drūʼošõ+A+Pl+Ill: drūošiz
     drūʼošõ+A+Pl+Ela: drūošist
